Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 60 O.S. 2021, Section 5, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5. Real or immovable property consists of:


1. Land., including the surface, subsurface, and airspace to


the extent recognized by law;


2. That which is Improvements and fixtures affixed to land.,


whether natural or artificial;


3. That which is Rights, privileges, and interests that are


incidental or appurtenant to land. including easements and rights-


of-way; and


4. That which is Property declared immovable by law.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3093 BLB 1/15/2026 2:29:48 PM

Req. No. 3093 Page 1